Illinois, session 104th, HB3672.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 3. The State Finance Act is amended by adding 5Section 5.1030 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 105/5.1030 new)7    Sec. 5.1030. The Equity Fund. 8    Section 5. The Property Tax Code is amended by changing 9Sections 21-90, 21-295, 21-305, 22-40, and 22-55 and by adding 10Sections 22-100 and 22-101 as follows: 11    (35 ILCS 200/21-90)12    Sec. 21-90. Purchase and sale by county; distribution of 13proceeds. 14    (a) When any property is offered for sale under any of the 15provisions of this Code, the county board of the county in 16which the property is located, in its discretion, may bid, or, 17in the case of forfeited property, may apply to purchase it or 18otherwise acquire the tax lien or certificate in the name of 19the county as trustee for all taxing districts having an 20interest in the property's taxes or special assessments for 21the nonpayment of which the property is sold. The presiding   HB3672- 2 -LRB104 11447 HLH 21535 b1officer of the county board, with the advice and consent of the 2board, may appoint on its behalf some officer, person, or 3entity to attend such sales, bid on tax liens or certificates, 4and act on behalf of the county when exercising its authority 5under this Section. The county shall apply on the bid or 6purchase the unpaid taxes and special assessments due upon the 7property. No cash need be paid. 8    (b) The county, as trustee for all taxing districts having 9an interest in the property's taxes or special assessments, 10shall be the designated holder of all tax liens or 11certificates that are forfeited to the State or county. No 12cash need be paid for the unpaid taxes and special assessments 13due on the property. All fees due under Section 21-295 shall be 14paid pursuant to that Section forfeited tax lien or 15certificate. 16    (c) For any tax lien or certificate acquired under 17subsection (a) or (b) of this Section, the county may take 18steps necessary to acquire title to the property and may 19manage and operate the property, including, but not limited 20to, mowing of grass, removal of nuisance greenery, removal of 21garbage, waste, debris or other materials, or the demolition, 22repair, or remediation of unsafe structures. When a county, or 23other taxing district within the county, is a petitioner for a 24tax deed, no filing fee shall be required. When a county or 25other taxing district within the county is the petitioner for 26a tax deed, one petition may be filed including all parcels   HB3672- 3 -LRB104 11447 HLH 21535 b1that are tax delinquent within the county or taxing district, 2and any publication made under Section 22-20 of this Code may 3combine all such parcels within a single notice. The notice 4may include the street address as listed on the most recent 5available tax bills, if available, and shall list the Property 6Index Number of the parcels for informational purposes. The 7county, as tax creditor and as trustee for other tax 8creditors, or other taxing district within the county, shall 9not be required to allege and prove that all taxes and special 10assessments which become due and payable after the sale or 11forfeiture to the county have been paid nor shall the county be 12required to pay the subsequently accruing taxes or special 13assessments at any time. The county board or its designee may 14prohibit the county collector from including the property in 15the tax sale of one or more subsequent years. The lien of taxes 16and special assessments which become due and payable after a 17sale to a county shall merge in the fee title of the county, or 18other taxing district within the county, on the issuance of a 19deed.20    The county may sell any property acquired with authority 21provided in this Section, or assign any tax certificate to any 22party, including, but not limited to, taxing districts, 23municipalities, land banks created pursuant to Illinois law, 24or non-profit developers focused on constructing affordable 25housing, subject to Sections 21-295 through 21-305. 26    The assigned tax certificate shall be void with no further   HB3672- 4 -LRB104 11447 HLH 21535 b1rights given to the assignee, including no right to refund or 2reimbursement, if a tax deed has not been recorded within 4 3years after the date of the assignment unless a court extends 4the assignment period as provided in this Section. Upon a 5motion by the assignee, a court may toll the 4-year deadline 6for a specified period of time if the court finds the assignee 7is prevented from obtaining or recording a deed by injunction 8or order of any court, by the refusal or inability of any court 9to act upon the application for a tax deed, by a municipality's 10refusal to issue necessary transfer stamps or approvals for 11recording, or by the refusal of the clerk to execute the deed. 12If an assigned tax certificate is void under this Section, it 13shall be forfeited to the county and held as a valid 14certificate of sale in the county's name pursuant to this 15Section 21-90. The proceeds of any sale or assignment under 16this Section, less all costs of the county incurred in the 17acquisition, operation, maintenance, and sale of the property 18or assignment of the tax certificate, including all costs 19associated with county staff and overhead used to perform the 20duties of the trustee set forth in this Section, shall be 21distributed to the taxing districts in proportion to their 22respective interests therein.23    Under Sections 21-110, 21-115, 21-120, and 21-190, a 24county may bid or purchase only in the absence of other 25bidders.26(Source: P.A. 102-363, eff. 1-1-22; 103-555, eff. 1-1-24.)   HB3672- 5 -LRB104 11447 HLH 21535 b1    (35 ILCS 200/21-295)2    Sec. 21-295. Creation of indemnity fund. 3    (a) In counties of less than 3,000,000 inhabitants, each 4person purchasing any property at a sale under this Code shall 5pay to the County Collector, prior to the issuance of any 6certificate of purchase, an indemnity fee set by the county 7collector of not more than $20 for each item purchased. A like 8sum shall be paid for each year that all or a portion of 9subsequent taxes are paid by the tax purchaser and posted to 10the tax judgment, sale, redemption and forfeiture record where 11the underlying certificate of purchase is recorded. 12    (a-5) In counties of 3,000,000 or more inhabitants, each 13person purchasing property at a sale under this Code shall pay 14to the County Collector a nonrefundable fee of $200 $80 for 15each item purchased plus an additional nonrefundable fee sum 16equal to 3% 5% of the taxes, interest, and penalties paid under 17Section 21-240. In these counties, the certificate holder 18shall also pay to the County Collector a fee of $150 $80 for 19each year that all or a portion of subsequent taxes are paid by 20the tax purchaser and posted to the tax judgment, sale, 21redemption, and forfeiture record. The changes to this 22subsection made by this amendatory Act of the 91st General 23Assembly are not a new enactment, but declaratory of existing 24law.25    (b) The amount paid prior to issuance of the certificate   HB3672- 6 -LRB104 11447 HLH 21535 b1of purchase pursuant to subsection (a) or (a-5) shall be 2included in the purchase price of the property in the 3certificate of purchase and all amounts paid under this 4Section shall be included in the amount required to redeem 5under Section 21-355, except for any the nonrefundable $80 fee 6for each item purchased at the tax sale as provided in this 7Section. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of 8Section 21-300, all nonrefundable fees money received under 9subsection (a) or (a-5) shall be paid by the Collector to the 10County Treasurer of the County in which the land is situated, 11for the purpose of an indemnity fund. The County Treasurer, as 12trustee of that fund, shall invest all of that fund, principal 13and income, in his or her hands from time to time, if not 14immediately required for payments of indemnities under 15subsection (a) of Section 21-305, in investments permitted by 16the Illinois State Board of Investment under Article 22A of 17the Illinois Pension Code. The county collector shall report 18annually to the county clerk on the condition and income of the 19fund. The indemnity fund shall be held to satisfy judgments 20obtained against the County Treasurer, as trustee of the fund. 21No payment shall be made from the fund, except upon a judgment 22of the court which ordered the issuance of a tax deed.23(Source: P.A. 100-1070, eff. 1-1-19; 101-659, eff. 3-23-21.) 24    (35 ILCS 200/21-305)25    Sec. 21-305. Payments from Indemnity Fund.   HB3672- 7 -LRB104 11447 HLH 21535 b1    (a) Any owner of property sold under any provision of this 2Code who sustains loss or damage by reason of the issuance of a 3tax deed under Section 21-445 or 22-40 and who is barred or is 4in any way precluded from bringing an action for the recovery 5of the property shall have the right to indemnity for the loss 6or damage sustained, limited as follows: 7        (1) An owner who resided on property that contained 4 8    or less dwelling units on the last day of the period of 9    redemption and who is equitably entitled to compensation 10    for the loss or damage sustained has the right to 11    indemnity. An equitable indemnity award shall be limited 12    to the fair cash value of the property as of the date the 13    tax deed was issued less any mortgages or liens on the 14    property, and the award will not exceed $99,000. The Court 15    shall liberally construe this equitable entitlement 16    standard to provide compensation wherever, in the 17    discretion of the Court, the equities warrant the action. 18        An owner of a property that contained 4 or less 19    dwelling units who requests an award in excess of $99,000 20    must prove that the loss of his or her property was not 21    attributable to his or her own fault or negligence before 22    an award in excess of $99,000 will be granted. 23        (2) An owner who sustains the loss or damage of any 24    property occasioned by reason of the issuance of a tax 25    deed, without fault or negligence of his or her own, has 26    the right to indemnity limited to the fair cash value of   HB3672- 8 -LRB104 11447 HLH 21535 b1    the property less any mortgages or liens on the property. 2    In determining the existence of fault or negligence, the 3    court shall consider whether the owner exercised ordinary 4    reasonable diligence under all of the relevant 5    circumstances. 6        (3) In determining the fair cash value of property 7    less any mortgages or liens on the property, the fair cash 8    value shall be reduced by the principal amount of all 9    taxes paid by the tax purchaser or his or her assignee 10    before the issuance of the tax deed. 11        (4) If an award made under paragraph (1) or (2) is 12    subject to a reduction by the amount of an outstanding 13    mortgage or lien on the property, other than the principal 14    amount of all taxes paid by the tax purchaser or his or her 15    assignee before the issuance of the tax deed and the 16    petitioner would be personally liable to the mortgagee or 17    lienholder for all or part of that reduction amount, the 18    court shall order an additional indemnity award to be paid 19    directly to the mortgagee or lienholder sufficient to 20    discharge the petitioner's personal liability. The court, 21    in its discretion, may order the joinder of the mortgagee 22    or lienholder as an additional party to the indemnity 23    action.24    (b) Indemnity fund; subrogation. 25        (1) Any person claiming indemnity hereunder shall 26    petition the Court which ordered the tax deed to issue,   HB3672- 9 -LRB104 11447 HLH 21535 b1    shall name the County Treasurer, as Trustee of the 2    indemnity fund, as defendant to the petition, and shall 3    ask that judgment be entered against the County Treasurer, 4    as Trustee, in the amount of the indemnity sought. The 5    provisions of the Civil Practice Law shall apply to 6    proceedings under the petition, except that neither the 7    petitioner nor County Treasurer shall be entitled to trial 8    by jury on the issues presented in the petition. The Court 9    shall liberally construe this Section to provide 10    compensation wherever in the discretion of the Court the 11    equities warrant such action. 12        (2) The County Treasurer, as Trustee of the indemnity 13    fund, shall be subrogated to all parties in whose favor 14    judgment may be rendered against him or her, and by third 15    party complaint may bring in as a defendant any person, 16    other than the tax deed grantee and its successors in 17    title, not a party to the action who is or may be liable to 18    him or her, as subrogee, for all or part of the 19    petitioner's claim against him or her.20    (c) Any contract involving the proceeds of a judgment for 21indemnity under this Section, between the tax deed grantee or 22its successors in title and the indemnity petitioner or his or 23her successors, shall be in writing. In any action brought 24under Section 21-305, the Collector shall be entitled to 25discovery regarding, but not limited to, the following: 26        (1) the identity of all persons beneficially   HB3672- 10 -LRB104 11447 HLH 21535 b1    interested in the contract, directly or indirectly, 2    including at least the following information: the names 3    and addresses of any natural persons; the place of 4    incorporation of any corporation and the names and 5    addresses of its shareholders unless it is publicly held; 6    the names and addresses of all general and limited 7    partners of any partnership; the names and addresses of 8    all persons having an ownership interest in any entity 9    doing business under an assumed name, and the county in 10    which the assumed business name is registered; and the 11    nature and extent of the interest in the contract of each 12    person identified; 13        (2) the time period during which the contract was 14    negotiated and agreed upon, from the date of the first 15    direct or indirect contact between any of the contracting 16    parties to the date of its execution; 17        (3) the name and address of each natural person who 18    took part in negotiating the contract, and the identity 19    and relationship of the party that the person represented 20    in the negotiations; and 21        (4) the existence of an agreement for payment of 22    attorney's fees by or on behalf of each party.23    Any information disclosed during discovery may be subject 24to protective order as deemed appropriate by the court. The 25terms of the contract shall not be used as evidence of value.26    (d) A petition of indemnity under this Section must be   HB3672- 11 -LRB104 11447 HLH 21535 b1filed within 10 years after the date the tax deed was issued. 2    (e) No payment from the indemnity fund shall be made if an 3application for Equity Fund Payment is filed or pending in any 4county of this State. 5(Source: P.A. 97-557, eff. 7-1-12.) 6    (35 ILCS 200/22-40)7    Sec. 22-40. Issuance of deed; possession. 8    (a) To obtain an order for issuance of tax deed, the 9petitioner must provide sufficient evidence that:10        (1) the redemption period has expired and the property 11    has not been redeemed; 12        (2) all taxes and special assessments which became due 13    and payable subsequent to the sale have been paid, unless 14    the county or its agent, as trustee pursuant to Section 15    21-90, is the petitioner; 16        (3) all forfeitures and sales which occur subsequent 17    to the sale are paid or redeemed, unless the county or its 18    agent, as trustee pursuant to Section 21-90, is the 19    petitioner; 20        (4) the notices required by law have been given, and 21    all advancements of public funds under the police power 22    made by a county, city, village, or town under Section 23    22-35 have been paid; and 24        (5) the petitioner has complied with all the 25    provisions of law entitling him or her to a deed.   HB3672- 12 -LRB104 11447 HLH 21535 b1    Upon receipt of sufficient evidence of the requirements 2under this subsection (a), the court shall find that the 3petitioner complied with those requirements and shall enter an 4order directing the county clerk, on the production of the tax 5certificate and a certified copy of the order, to issue to the 6purchaser or its assignee a tax deed. The court shall insist on 7strict compliance with Section 22-10 through 22-25. Prior to 8the entry of an order directing the issuance of a tax deed, the 9petitioner shall furnish the court with a report of 10proceedings of the evidence received on the application for 11tax deed and the report of proceedings shall be filed and made 12a part of the court record.13    (b) Except as provided in subsection (e), if taxes for 14years prior to the year or years sold are or become delinquent 15subsequent to the date of sale, the court shall find that the 16lien of those delinquent taxes has been or will be merged into 17the tax deed grantee's title if the court determines that the 18tax deed grantee or any prior holder of the certificate of 19purchase, or any person or entity under common ownership or 20control with any such grantee or prior holder of the 21certificate of purchase, was at no time the holder of any 22certificate of purchase for the years sought to be merged. If 23delinquent taxes are merged into the tax deed pursuant to this 24subsection, the court shall enter an order declaring which 25specific taxes have been or will be merged into the tax deed 26title and directing the county treasurer and county clerk to   HB3672- 13 -LRB104 11447 HLH 21535 b1reflect that declaration in the warrant and judgment records; 2provided, that no such order shall be effective until a tax 3deed has been issued and timely recorded. Nothing contained in 4this Section shall relieve any owner liable for delinquent 5property taxes under this Code from the payment of the taxes 6that have been merged into the title upon issuance of the tax 7deed.8    (c) The county clerk is entitled to a fee of $10 in 9counties of 3,000,000 or more inhabitants and $5 in counties 10with less than 3,000,000 inhabitants for the issuance of the 11tax deed, with the exception of deeds issued to the county 12pursuant to its authority under Section 21-90. The clerk may 13not include in a tax deed more than one property as listed, 14assessed and sold in one description, except in cases where 15several properties are owned by one person.16    Upon application, the court shall, enter an order to place 17the tax deed grantee or the grantee's successor in interest in 18possession of the property and may enter orders and grant 19relief as may be necessary or desirable to maintain the 20grantee or the grantee's successor in interest in possession.21    (d) The court shall retain jurisdiction to enter orders 22pursuant to subsections (b) and (c) of this Section and 23pursuant to Sections 22-100 and 22-101. Public Act 92-223 and 24Public Act 95-477 . This amendatory Act of the 92nd General 25Assembly and this amendatory Act of the 95th General Assembly 26shall be construed as being declarative of existing law and   HB3672- 14 -LRB104 11447 HLH 21535 b1not as a new enactment.2    (e) Prior to the issuance of any tax deed under this 3Section, the petitioner must redeem all taxes and special 4assessments on the property that are subject to a pending tax 5petition filed by a county or its assignee pursuant to Section 621-90.7    (f) If, for any reason, a purchaser fails to obtain an 8order for tax deed within the required time period and no sale 9in error was granted or redemption paid, then the certificate 10shall be forfeited to the county, as trustee, pursuant to 11Section 21-90. 12(Source: P.A. 103-555, eff. 1-1-24; revised 8-5-24.) 13    (35 ILCS 200/22-55)14    Sec. 22-55. Tax deeds to convey merchantable title. This 15Section shall be liberally construed so that tax deeds shall 16convey merchantable title. In the event the property has been 17taken by eminent domain under the Eminent Domain Act, the tax 18purchaser shall be entitled to the award which is the 19substitute for the property. Tax deeds issued pursuant to this 20Section are subject to Section 22-70. Nothing in Section 2122-100 or Section 22-101 shall affect the merchantable title 22conveyed upon the recording of the tax deed. This amendatory 23Act of the 104th General Assembly shall be construed as being 24declarative of existing law and not as a new enactment. 25(Source: P.A. 94-1055, eff. 1-1-07.)   HB3672- 15 -LRB104 11447 HLH 21535 b1    (35 ILCS 200/22-100 new)2    Sec. 22-100. Equity Fund collection.3    (a) Each county treasurer shall transmit to the State 4Treasurer all Equity Fund payments paid to the county 5treasurer under this Section and in the county treasurer's 6possession after each tax sale, with a report under oath 7identifying the total amount of certificates of purchase sold 8and the amount collected for the Equity Fund from each 9certificate. Those amounts and the report shall be transmitted 10to and received by the State Treasurer by the 10th day after 11each tax sale. At the same time, a copy of the report shall be 12furnished to the Attorney General. The report shall be in a 13form and contain the particulars as the State Treasurer may 14prescribe. The State Treasurer shall give the county treasurer 15a receipt for the amount transmitted to the State Treasurer. 16Except as otherwise provided in this Section, if any county 17treasurer fails to pay to the State Treasurer all amounts that 18may be due and payable under this Section as required by this 19Section, the county treasurer shall pay to the State 20Treasurer, as a penalty, a sum of money equal to the interest 21on the amounts not paid at the rate of 1% per month from the 22time those amounts are due by the county treasurer until those 23amounts are paid. The sureties upon the official bond of the 24county treasurer shall be security for the payment of the 25penalty. The penalty under this Section may be recovered in a   HB3672- 16 -LRB104 11447 HLH 21535 b1civil action against the county treasurer and his or her 2sureties, in the name of the People of the State of Illinois, 3in the circuit court within the county wherein the county 4treasurer is resident; and the penalty, when recovered, shall 5be paid into the State treasury. The civil action to recover 6the penalty shall be brought by the State Treasurer within 10 7days after the failure of the county treasurer to pay to the 8State Treasurer any amounts collected by the county treasurer 9within the time required by this Section. Failure to bring the 10action within that time shall not prevent the bringing of the 11action thereafter. It is the duty of the State Treasurer to 12make necessary and proper investigation to determine what 13amounts should be paid under this Section.14    The State Treasurer may waive penalties imposed by 15subsection (a) of this Section on a case-by-case basis if the 16State Treasurer finds that imposing penalties would be 17unreasonable or unnecessarily burdensome because the delay in 18payment was due to an incident caused by the operation of an 19extraordinary force, including, but not limited to, the 20occurrence of a natural disaster, that cannot be foreseen, 21that cannot be avoided by the exercise of due care, and for 22which no person can be held liable.23    The total amount collected from the county treasurers 24shall be deposited into the Equity Fund, a special fund 25created in the State treasury.26    Moneys in the Equity Fund shall be expended exclusively   HB3672- 17 -LRB104 11447 HLH 21535 b1for the purpose of paying the amount ordered for equity 2surplus payments to Illinois property owners who have lost 3their property by a recorded tax deed, except that, whenever 4the State Treasurer determines that any such moneys in the 5Equity Fund exceed the amount required for the purpose of 6paying equity surplus payments resulting from property 7ownership being divested by tax deed, the State Treasurer may 8transfer any such excess amounts from the Equity Fund to the 9General Revenue Fund.10    The State Treasurer shall order payment of refunds 11resulting from orders entered on timely applications as 12provided in this Section from the Equity Fund only to the 13extent that amounts have been deposited and retained in the 14Fund.15    This Section shall constitute an irrevocable and 16continuing appropriation from Illinois tax lien purchasers for 17the purpose of paying equity surplus payments to the divested 18property upon the order of the State Treasurer in accordance 19with the provisions of this Section and for the purpose of 20paying equity surplus to the divested property owner as 21required by the constitution and law.22    (b) In counties of less than 3,000,000 inhabitants, each 23person purchasing any property at a sale under this Code shall 24pay to the county collector a nonrefundable Equity Fund fee of 25$150, prior to the issuance of any certificate of purchase and 26for each item purchased under Section 21-240. A like sum shall   HB3672- 18 -LRB104 11447 HLH 21535 b1be paid for each year that all or a portion of subsequent taxes 2are paid by the tax purchaser and posted to the tax judgment, 3sale, redemption and forfeiture record where the underlying 4certificate of purchase is recorded. The $150 fee per 5certificate shall be paid by all certificate holders including 6all trustees and governmental agencies holding certificates 7under Section 21-90.8    (c) In counties of 3,000,000 or more inhabitants, each 9person purchasing property at a sale under this Code shall pay 10to the county collector a nonrefundable Equity Fund fee of 11$250 prior to the issuance of any certificate of purchase and 12for each item purchased under Section 21-240. In these 13counties, the certificate holder shall also pay to the county 14collector a fee of $200 for each year that all or a portion of 15subsequent taxes are paid by the tax purchaser and posted to 16the tax judgment, sale, redemption, and forfeiture record. The 17$250 fee per certificate shall be paid by all certificate 18holders including all trustees and governmental agencies 19holding certificates under Section 21-90.20    (d) The Equity Fund fees collected under subsections (b) 21and (c) shall be collected, disbursed and accounted for as set 22forth in subsection (a).  23    (35 ILCS 200/22-101 new)24    Sec. 22-101. Application for Equity Fund Payment.25    (a) No payment shall be made from the Equity Fund, except   HB3672- 19 -LRB104 11447 HLH 21535 b1upon a judgment on the application to the Equity Fund. 2Applications for Equity Fund payments shall be made to the 3county treasurer in which the property is situated in the 4following form, completely filled in and submitted to the 5applicable county treasurer on or before one year after the 6tax deed is recorded, along with a nonrefundable application 7fee as designated by the applicable county treasurer:8APPLICATION FOR EQUITY FUND PAYMENT 9    Name.....................................................10    Address..................................................11    City State Zip...........................................12    Telephone No.............................................13    Email Address............................................14    Date of Application......................................15    I, ....... , owned or possessed ownership interest in the 16property commonly known as........., identified by 17parcel/property index number ......... until a tax deed was 18recorded on ......... in ........ County, Illinois. A copy of 19the ownership deed and tax deed are attached to this 20application.21    ....... (initial here) I agree to the County Assessor's 22determination of the estimated fair market value for the year 23in which the tax deed was recorded.24    ....... (initial here) I do not agree to the County 25Assessor's determination of the estimated fair market value 26for the year in which the tax deed was recorded and have   HB3672- 20 -LRB104 11447 HLH 21535 b1provided a certified appraisal from an Illinois licensed 2appraiser stating the fair market value of the property lost 3to tax deed is $.... as of the date the tax deed was recorded. 4Under penalties as provided by law pursuant to Section 1-109 5of the Code of Civil Procedure, the undersigned certifies that 6the statements in this instrument are true and correct.7    (b) Upon receipt of the application, the county collector, 8through the state's attorney's office shall review the 9application and request any additional document necessary. 10Upon review of the application, and if approved, the county 11collector shall file a Petition for Equity Surplus in the 12court entering the order directing the issuance of tax deed. 13The court shall order the payment and determine the amount and 14enter an order directing the State Treasurer to pay the amount 15determined to the Equity Fund applicant from the Equity Fund.16    (c) The county shall be allowed to pass an ordinance to 17charge an application fee of up to $500 per application for 18payment from the Tax Deed Equity Surplus Fund.19    (d) The amount of the equity surplus shall be calculated 20by the amount of the fair market value of the property at the 21time of loss, less:22        (1) the lien for taxes, including all statutory fees 23    and costs posted to the tax sale paid by the grantee; and24        (2) any taxes paid subsequent to the last day to 25    redeem but prior to entry of the order directing the 26    county clerk to issue a tax deed.  HB3672- 21 -LRB104 11447 HLH 21535 b1    (e) If any owner or applicant with a valid ownership 2interest in the property lost to tax deed files a petition to 3vacate the tax deed pursuant to Section 2-1203 or 2-1401 of the 4Code of Civil Procedure or Section 22-85, the time from the 5date of filing through final judgment thereon be excluded from 6computation of the one-year period in this Section.